Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB457.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, local boards shall require each
public elementary and secondary school to display the national motto of the
United States, "In God We Trust," in a prominent location in the school.
(b) The display required in paragraph (a) of this subsection may take the form of
but is not limited to a mounted plaque or student artwork.
(2)[(c)] As used in[For purposes of] this section, "prominent location" means a school
entryway, cafeteria, or common area where students are likely to see an item on
display[the national motto].
(3)[(2)] Local boards may allow any teacher or administrator in a public school
district of the Commonwealth to read or post in a public school building, classroom,
or event any excerpts or portions of: the national motto; the national anthem; the
pledge of allegiance; the preamble to the Kentucky Constitution; the Declaration of
Independence; the Mayflower Compact; the writings, speeches, documents, and
proclamations of the founding fathers and presidents of the United States; United
States Supreme Court decisions; and acts of the United States Congress including
the published text of the Congressional Record. There shall be no content-based
censorship of American history or heritage in the Commonwealth based on
religious references in these writings, documents, and records.
(4) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, local boards shall require each public
school building that contains instructional space for students in grades six (6)
through twelve (12) to conspicuously display in a prominent location, in both
English and Spanish, a printed abstract of KRS 339.210 to 339.450, a list of the
limited or prohibited occupations for minors, and a notice stating the working
hours per day for each day of the week permissible for minors to work. The same
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1561
information or display shall also be posted on a district or school's website.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed